Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.066

Prohibited acts—Penalty.

It is a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW for:

(1) Any person to remove, alter, or obliterate any manufacturer's make, model, or serial number, personal identification number, or identifying marks engraved or etched upon an item of personal property that was purchased, consigned, or received in pledge. In addition an item shall not be accepted for pledge or a secondhand purchase where the manufacturer's make, model, or serial number, personal identification number, or identifying marks engraved or etched upon an item of personal property has been removed, altered, or obliterated;

(2) Any person to knowingly make, cause, or allow to be made any false entry or misstatement of any material matter in any book, record, or writing required to be kept under this chapter;

(3) Any pawnbroker or secondhand dealer to receive any property from any person under the age of eighteen years, any person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or any person known to the pawnbroker or secondhand dealer as having been convicted of burglary, robbery, theft, or possession of or receiving stolen property within the past ten years whether the person is acting in his or her own behalf or as the agent of another;

(4) Any pawnbroker to engage in the business of cashing or selling checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose unless the pawnbroker complies with the provisions of chapter 31.45 RCW; or

(5) Any person to violate knowingly any other provision of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 355 s 21; 1991 c 323 s 10; 1984 c 10 s 12.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1991 c 323 s 10 and by 1991 c 355 s 21, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date, implementation—1991 c 355: See RCW 31.45.900.